Utah statutes.
4-37-503.   Fish Health Policy Board.
(1)  There is created within the department the Fish Health Policy Board which
shall establish policies designed to prevent the outbreak of, control the
spread of, and eradicate pathogens that cause disease in aquatic animals.
(2)  The Fish Health Policy Board shall:
(a)  in accordance with Subsection (6)(b), determine procedures and
requirements for certifying a source of aquatic animals as health approved,
including:
(i)  the pathogens for which inspection is required to receive health
approval;
(ii)  the pathogens that may not be present to receive health approval; and
(iii)  standards and procedures required for the inspection of aquatic
animals;
(b)  establish procedures for the timely reporting of the presence of a
pathogen and disease threat;
(c)  create policies and procedures for, and appoint, an emergency response
team to:
(i)  investigate a serious disease threat;
(ii)  develop and monitor a plan of action; and
(iii)  report to:
(A)  the commissioner of agriculture and food;
(B)  the director of the Division of Wildlife Resources; and
(C)  the chair of the Fish Health Policy Board; and
(d)  develop a unified statewide aquaculture disease control plan.
(3)  The Fish Health Policy Board shall advise the commissioner of agriculture
and food and the executive director of the Department of Natural Resources
regarding:
(a)  educational programs and information systems to educate and inform the
public about practices that the public may employ to prevent the spread of
disease; and
(b)  communication and interaction between the department and the Division of
Wildlife Resources regarding fish health policies and procedures.
(4) (a) (i)  The governor shall appoint the following seven members to the
Fish Health Policy Board:
(A)  one member from names submitted by the Department of Natural Resources;
(B)  one member from names submitted by the Department of Agriculture and
Food;
(C)  one member from names submitted by a nonprofit corporation that promotes
sport fishing;
(D)  one member from names submitted by a nonprofit corporation that promotes
the aquaculture industry;
(E)  one member from names submitted by the Department of Natural Resources
and the Department of Agriculture and Food;
(F)  one member from names submitted by a nonprofit corporation that promotes
sport fishing; and
(G)  one member from names submitted by a nonprofit corporation that promotes
the aquaculture industry.
(ii)  The members appointed under Subsections (4)(a)(i)(E) through (G) shall
be:
(A) (I)  faculty members of an institution of higher education; or
(II)  qualified professionals; and
(B)  have education and knowledge in:
(I)  fish pathology;
(II)  business;
(III)  ecology; or
(IV)  parasitology.
(iii)  At least one member appointed under Subsections (4)(a)(i)(E) through
(G) shall have education and knowledge about fish pathology.
(iv) (A)  A nominating person shall submit at least three names to the
governor.
(B)  If the governor rejects all the names submitted for a member, the
recommending person shall submit additional names.
(b)  Except as required by Subsection (4)(c), the term of office of board
members shall be four years.
(c)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (4)(b), the governor
shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms
to ensure that the terms of board members are staggered so that approximately
half of the board is appointed every two years.
(d)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed for the unexpired term.
(e)  The board members shall elect a chair of the board from the board's
membership.
(f)  The board shall meet upon the call of the chair or a majority of the
board members.
(g)  An action of the board shall be adopted upon approval of the majority of
voting members.
(5) (a) (i)  A member who is not a government employee may not receive
compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem
and expenses incurred in the performance of the member’s official duties at
the rates established by the Division of Finance under Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(ii)  A member may decline to receive per diem and expenses for the member's
service.
(b) (i)  A state government officer and employee member who does not receive
salary, per diem, or expenses from the agency the member represents for the
member's service may receive per diem and expenses incurred in the performance
of the member's official duties at the rates established by the Division of
Finance under Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(ii)  A state government officer and employee member may decline to receive
per diem and expenses for the member's service.
(c) (i)  A higher education member who does not receive salary, per diem, or
expenses from the entity that the member represents for the member's service
may receive per diem and expenses incurred in the performance of the member's
official duties at the rates established by the Division of Finance under
Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(ii)  A higher education member may decline to receive per diem and expenses
for the member's service.
(6) (a)  The board shall make rules consistent with its responsibilities and
duties specified in this section.
(b)  Except as provided by this chapter, all rules adopted by the Fish Health
Policy Board must be consistent with the suggested procedures for the
detection and identification of pathogens published by the American Fisheries
Society's Fish Health Section.
(c) (i)  Rules of the department and Fish Health Policy Board pertaining to
the control of disease shall remain in effect until the Fish Health Policy
Board enacts rules to replace those provisions.
(ii)  The Fish Health Policy Board shall promptly amend rules that are
inconsistent with the current suggested procedures published by the American
Fisheries Society.
(d)  The Fish Health Policy Board may waive a requirement established by the
Fish Health Policy Board's rules if:
(i)  the rule specifies the waiver criteria and procedures; and
(ii)  the waiver will not threaten other aquaculture facilities or wild
aquatic animal populations.
